Washington statutes.
RCW 7.69.035

Protection of witnesses who testify against criminal gang members—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that witnesses are often fearful of testifying against criminal gang members. Witnesses may be subject to harassment, intimidation, and threats. While the state does not ensure protection of witnesses, the state intends to provide resources to assist local prosecutors in combating gang-related crimes and to help citizens perform their civic duty to testify in these cases.

[ 2008 c 276 s 501.]

NOTES:

Severability—Part headings, subheadings not law—2008 c 276: See notes following RCW 36.28A.200.